Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2203
Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this code, the principles of law and equity supplement its provisions.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 3, UPC § 1-103.